Missouri, session 2026, HB3235.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 21.487, 135.714, 160.405, 167.950, 173.680, 173.750, and
633.420, RSMo, and section 167.910 as enacted by house bill no. 1606, ninety-ninth general
assembly, second regular session, and section 167.910 as enacted by house bill no. 1415,
ninety-ninth general assembly, second regular session, are repealed and five new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 21.487, 135.714, 160.405, 167.950, and
173.750, to read as follows:
21.487. The joint committee on education shall [develop a comprehensive funding
formula for Missouri public institutions of higher education by December 31, 2013. The
general assembly shall implement a funding formula beginning in fiscal year 2015] receive a
report from the Missouri department of higher education and workforce development
developed by the National Center for Higher Education Management Systems review
and make recommendations to the general assembly.
135.714. 1. Each educational assistance organization shall:
(1) Notify the state treasurer of such organization's intent to provide scholarship
accounts to qualified students;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3235 2
(2) Demonstrate to the state treasurer that such organization is exempt from federal
income tax under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(3) Provide a state treasurer-approved receipt to taxpayers for contributions made to
the organization;
(4) Ensure that grants are distributed to scholarship accounts of qualified students in
the following order:
(a) Qualified students who received a scholarship grant in the previous school year;
(b) Qualified students who are siblings of qualified students who will receive a
scholarship grant in the current school year;
(c) Qualified students that have an approved ["individualized education plan"]
"individualized education program" (IEP) developed under the federal Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. Section 1400, et seq., as amended, or who have
been diagnosed with dyslexia, as the term "dyslexia" is defined in section [633.420] 167.950;
(d) Qualified students who are eligible for free lunch as approved by the department
of elementary and secondary education in accordance with federal regulations and who reside
in an unaccredited or provisionally accredited school district;
(e) Qualified students who are eligible for reduced price lunch as approved by the
department of elementary and secondary education in accordance with federal regulations and
who reside in an unaccredited or provisionally accredited school district;
(f) Qualified students who are eligible for free lunch as approved by the department
of elementary and secondary education in accordance with federal regulations;
(g) Qualified students who are eligible for reduced price lunch as approved by the
department of elementary and secondary education in accordance with federal regulations;
(h) Qualified students who are active duty military dependents who have relocated to
Missouri and are enrolling in a school in the state for the first time; and
(i) All other qualified students;
(5) Ensure that:
(a) One hundred percent of such organization's revenues from interest or investments
is spent on scholarship accounts;
(b) At least ninety percent of such organization's revenues from qualifying
contributions is spent on scholarship accounts; and
(c) Marketing and administrative expenses do not exceed the following limits of such
organization's remaining revenue from contributions:
a. Ten percent for the first two hundred fifty thousand dollars;
b. Eight percent for the next five hundred thousand dollars; and
c. Three percent thereafter;

HB 3235 3
(6) (a) Distribute scholarship account payments either four times per year or in a
single lump sum at the beginning of the year as requested by the parent of a qualified student,
based on the state adequacy target as defined in section 163.011 and calculated by the
department of elementary and secondary education, subject to the following total grant
amount limits:
a. For a qualified student who meets the criteria to be included in a school district's
limited English proficiency pupil count as set forth in subdivision (8) of section 163.011, not
more than one hundred sixty percent of the state adequacy target;
b. For a qualified student who is eligible for free or reduced price lunch as approved
by the department of elementary and secondary education in accordance with federal
regulations, not more than one hundred twenty-five percent of the state adequacy target;
c. For a qualified student who has an approved [individualized education plan]
individualized education program developed under the federal Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. Section 1400, et seq., as amended, not more than one
hundred seventy-five percent of the state adequacy target; and
d. For all other qualified students, not more than the state adequacy target;
(b) Scholarship account payments distributed under this subdivision shall be in the
form of a deposit into the scholarship account of the qualified student;
(7) Provide the state treasurer, upon request, with criminal background checks on all
such organization's employees and board members and exclude from employment or
governance any individual who might reasonably pose a risk to the appropriate use of
contributed funds;
(8) Demonstrate such organization's financial accountability by:
(a) Submitting to the state treasurer annual audit financial statements by a certified
public accountant within six months of the end of the educational assistance organization's
fiscal year; and
(b) Having an auditor certify that the report is free of material misstatements; and
(9) Ensure that participating students take the state achievement tests or nationally
norm-referenced tests that measure learning gains in math and English language arts, and
provide for value-added assessment, in grades that require testing under the statewide
assessment system set forth in section 160.518;
(10) Allow costs of the testing requirements to be covered by the scholarships
distributed by the educational assistance organization;
(11) Provide the parents of each student who was tested with a copy of the results of
the tests on an annual basis, beginning with the first year of testing;

HB 3235 4
(12) Provide the test results to the state treasurer, the department of elementary and
secondary education, and the board established in section 135.715 on an annual basis,
beginning with the first year of testing;
(13) Report student information that would allow the state treasurer, the department
of elementary and secondary education, and the board established in section 135.715 to
aggregate data by grade level, gender, family income level, and race;
(14) Provide rates of high school graduation, college attendance, and college
graduation for participating students to the state treasurer, the department of elementary and
secondary education, and the board established in section 135.715 in a manner consistent with
nationally recognized standards;
(15) Provide to the state treasurer, the department of elementary and secondary
education, and the board established in section 135.715 the results from an annual parental
satisfaction survey, including information about the number of years that the parent's child
has participated in the scholarship program. The annual satisfaction survey shall ask parents
of scholarship students to express:
(a) Their level of satisfaction with the child's academic achievement, including
academic achievement at the schools the child attends through the scholarship program versus
academic achievement at the school previously attended;
(b) Their level of satisfaction with school safety at the schools the child attends
through the scholarship program versus safety at the schools previously attended;
(16) Demonstrate such organization's financial viability, if such organization is to
receive donations of fifty thousand dollars or more during the school year, by filing with the
state treasurer before the start of the school year a surety bond payable to the state in an
amount equal to the aggregate amount of contributions expected to be received during the
school year or other financial information that demonstrates the financial viability of the
100 educational assistance organization.
101 2. The annual audit required under this section shall include:
102 (1) The name and address of the educational assistance organization;
103 (2) The name and address of each qualified student for whom a parent opened a
104 scholarship account with the organization;
105 (3) The total number and total dollar amount of contributions received during the
106 previous calendar year; and
107 (4) The total number and total dollar amount of scholarship accounts opened during
108 the previous calendar year.
109 3. The state treasurer shall:
110 (1) Ensure compliance with all student privacy laws for data in the state treasurer's
111 possession;

HB 3235 5
112 (2) Collect all test results;
113 (3) Provide the test results and associated learning gains to the public via a state
114 website after the third year of test and test-related data collection. The findings shall be
115 aggregated by the students' grade level, gender, family income level, number of years of
116 participation in the scholarship program, and race; and
117 (4) Provide graduation rates to the public via a state website after the third year of test
118 and test-related data collection.
119 4. The state treasurer shall cause the following information to be posted on the state
120 treasurer's website annually, provided that no personally identifiable information of any
121 student is released:
122 (1) The number of students who have been awarded a scholarship to date and the
123 number of students who have been awarded a scholarship in the current school year;
124 (2) The number of scholarship recipients enrolled in each qualified school, along with
125 the number of recipients who qualify for free and reduced price lunch and the number of
126 recipients who receive special education services and the type of special education services
127 received. Such information shall be broken down by school year and the total to date;
128 (3) The total number of scholarship recipients who are eligible for free and reduced
129 price lunch as approved by the department of elementary and secondary education in
130 accordance with federal guidelines, broken down by school year and the total to date;
131 (4) The total number of scholarship recipients who have an [individualized education
132 plan] individualized education program (IEP) developed under the federal Individuals with
133 Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. Section 1400, et seq., as amended, broken down by
134 school year and the total to date;
135 (5) The number of scholarship recipients who have received a grant from each
136 educational assistance organization, broken down by school year and the total to date;
137 (6) The student test scores required to be posted online pursuant to subdivision (3) of
138 subsection 3 of this section;
139 (7) The results of the parent satisfaction survey required annually pursuant to
140 subdivision (15) of subsection 1 of this section;
141 (8) The average dollar amount of a scholarship grant for all students who participate
142 in the program;
143 (9) The average dollar amount of a scholarship grant for all students who participate
144 in the program and who have an IEP;
145 (10) The average duration of a student's participation in the program;
146 (11) The number of students who are in their first year of participation in the
147 program;

HB 3235 6
148 (12) A list of the educational assistance organizations that make contributions to the
149 empowerment scholarship accounts of students enrolled in each qualified school; and
150 (13) The total amount of money that has been remitted from qualified students'
151 empowerment scholarship accounts to each qualified school, broken down by school year and
152 the total aggregate amount.
153 5. An educational assistance organization may contract with private financial
154 management firms to manage scholarship accounts with the supervision of the state treasurer,
155 provided that all laws and regulations that apply to employees of such educational assistance
156 organization shall also apply to the actions of any employees of the management firm while
157 they are conducting work relating to the direct decision-making of the operation of such
158 educational assistance organization.
160.405. 1. A person, group or organization seeking to establish a charter school
shall submit the proposed charter, as provided in this section, to a sponsor. If the sponsor is
not a school board, the applicant shall give a copy of its application to the school board of the
district in which the charter school is to be located and to the state board of education, within
five business days of the date the application is filed with the proposed sponsor. The school
board may file objections with the proposed sponsor, and, if a charter is granted, the school
board may file objections with the state board of education. The charter shall include a
legally binding performance contract that describes the obligations and responsibilities of the
school and the sponsor as outlined in sections 160.400 to 160.425 and section 167.349 and
shall address the following:
(1) A mission and vision statement for the charter school;
(2) A description of the charter school's organizational structure and bylaws of the
governing body, which will be responsible for the policy, financial management, and
operational decisions of the charter school, including the nature and extent of parental,
professional educator, and community involvement in the governance and operation of the
charter school;
(3) A financial plan for the first three years of operation of the charter school
including provisions for annual audits;
(4) A description of the charter school's policy for securing personnel services, its
personnel policies, personnel qualifications, and professional development plan;
(5) A description of the grades or ages of students being served;
(6) The school's calendar of operation, which shall include at least the equivalent of a
full school term as defined in section 160.011;
(7) A description of the charter school's pupil performance standards and academic
program performance standards, which shall meet the requirements of subdivision (6) of
subsection 4 of this section. The charter school program shall be designed to enable each

HB 3235 7
pupil to achieve such standards and shall contain a complete set of indicators, measures,
metrics, and targets for academic program performance, including specific goals on
graduation rates and standardized test performance and academic growth;
(8) A description of the charter school's educational program and curriculum;
(9) The term of the charter, which shall be five years and may be renewed;
(10) Procedures, consistent with the Missouri financial accounting manual, for
monitoring the financial accountability of the charter, which shall meet the requirements of
subdivision (4) of subsection 4 of this section;
(11) Preopening requirements for applications that require that charter schools meet
all health, safety, and other legal requirements prior to opening;
(12) A description of the charter school's policies on student discipline and student
admission, which shall include a statement, where applicable, of the validity of attendance of
students who do not reside in the district but who may be eligible to attend under the terms of
judicial settlements and procedures that ensure admission of students with disabilities in a
nondiscriminatory manner;
(13) A description of the charter school's grievance procedure for parents or
guardians;
(14) A description of the agreement and time frame for implementation between the
charter school and the sponsor as to when a sponsor shall intervene in a charter school, when
a sponsor shall revoke a charter for failure to comply with subsection 8 of this section, and
when a sponsor will not renew a charter under subsection 9 of this section;
(15) Procedures to be implemented if the charter school should close, as provided in
subdivision (6) of subsection 16 of section 160.400 including:
(a) Orderly transition of student records to new schools and archival of student
records;
(b) Archival of business operation and transfer or repository of personnel records;
(c) Submission of final financial reports;
(d) Resolution of any remaining financial obligations;
(e) Disposition of the charter school's assets upon closure; and
(f) A notification plan to inform parents or guardians of students, the local school
district, the retirement system in which the charter school's employees participate, and the
state board of education within thirty days of the decision to close;
(16) A description of the special education and related services that shall be available
to meet the needs of students with disabilities; and
(17) For all new or revised charters, procedures to be used upon closure of the charter
school requiring that unobligated assets of the charter school be returned to the department of
elementary and secondary education for their disposition, which upon receipt of such assets

HB 3235 8
shall return them to the local school district in which the school was located, the state, or any
other entity to which they would belong.

Charter schools operating on August 27, 2012, shall have until August 28, 2015, to meet the
requirements of this subsection.
2. Proposed charters shall be subject to the following requirements:
(1) A charter shall be submitted to the sponsor, and follow the sponsor's policies and
procedures for review and granting of a charter approval, and be approved by the state board
of education by January thirty-first prior to the school year of the proposed opening date of
the charter school;
(2) A charter may be approved when the sponsor determines that the requirements of
this section are met, determines that the applicant is sufficiently qualified to operate a charter
school, and that the proposed charter is consistent with the sponsor's charter sponsorship
goals and capacity. The sponsor's decision of approval or denial shall be made within ninety
days of the filing of the proposed charter;
(3) If the charter is denied, the proposed sponsor shall notify the applicant in writing
as to the reasons for its denial and forward a copy to the state board of education within five
business days following the denial;
(4) If a proposed charter is denied by a sponsor, the proposed charter may be
submitted to the state board of education, along with the sponsor's written reasons for its
denial. If the state board determines that the applicant meets the requirements of this section,
that the applicant is sufficiently qualified to operate the charter school, and that granting a
charter to the applicant would be likely to provide educational benefit to the children of the
district, the state board may grant a charter and act as sponsor of the charter school. The state
board shall review the proposed charter and make a determination of whether to deny or grant
the proposed charter within sixty days of receipt of the proposed charter, provided that any
charter to be considered by the state board of education under this subdivision shall be
submitted no later than March first prior to the school year in which the charter school intends
to begin operations. The state board of education shall notify the applicant in writing as the
reasons for its denial, if applicable; and
(5) The sponsor of a charter school shall give priority to charter school applicants that
propose a school oriented to high-risk students and to the reentry of dropouts into the school
system. If a sponsor grants three or more charters, at least one-third of the charters granted by
the sponsor shall be to schools that actively recruit dropouts or high-risk students as their
student body and address the needs of dropouts or high-risk students through their proposed
mission, curriculum, teaching methods, and services. For purposes of this subsection, a
100 "high-risk" student is one who is at least one year behind in satisfactory completion of course

HB 3235 9
101 work or obtaining high school credits for graduation, has dropped out of school, is at risk of
102 dropping out of school, needs drug and alcohol treatment, has severe behavioral problems,
103 has been suspended from school three or more times, has a history of severe truancy, is a
104 pregnant or parenting teen, has been referred for enrollment by the judicial system, is exiting
105 incarceration, is a refugee, is homeless or has been homeless sometime within the preceding
106 six months, has been referred by an area school district for enrollment in an alternative
107 program, or qualifies as high risk under department of elementary and secondary education
108 guidelines. Dropout shall be defined through the guidelines of the school core data report.
109 The provisions of this subsection do not apply to charters sponsored by the state board of
110 education.
111 3. If a charter is approved by a sponsor, the charter application shall be submitted to
112 the state board of education, along with a statement of finding by the sponsor that the
113 application meets the requirements of sections 160.400 to 160.425 and section 167.349 and a
114 monitoring plan under which the charter sponsor shall evaluate the academic performance,
115 including annual performance reports, of students enrolled in the charter school. The state
116 board of education shall approve or deny a charter application within sixty days of receipt of
117 the application. The state board of education may deny a charter on grounds that the
118 application fails to meet the requirements of sections 160.400 to 160.425 and section 167.349
119 or that a charter sponsor previously failed to meet the statutory responsibilities of a charter
120 sponsor. Any denial of a charter application made by the state board of education shall be in
121 writing and shall identify the specific failures of the application to meet the requirements of
122 sections 160.400 to 160.425 and section 167.349, and the written denial shall be provided
123 within ten business days to the sponsor.
124 4. A charter school shall, as provided in its charter:
125 (1) Be nonsectarian in its programs, admission policies, employment practices, and
126 all other operations;
127 (2) Comply with laws and regulations of the state, county, or city relating to health,
128 safety, and state minimum educational standards, as specified by the state board of education,
129 including the requirements relating to student discipline under sections 160.261, 167.161,
130 167.164, and 167.171, notification of criminal conduct to law enforcement authorities under
131 sections 167.115 [to] and167.117, academic assessment under section 160.518, transmittal of
132 school records under section 167.020, the minimum amount of school time required under
133 section 171.031, and the employee criminal history background check and the family care
134 safety registry check under section 168.133;
135 (3) Except as provided in sections 160.400 to 160.425 and as specifically provided in
136 other sections, be exempt from all laws and rules relating to schools, governing boards and
137 school districts;

HB 3235 10
138 (4) Be financially accountable, use practices consistent with the Missouri financial
139 accounting manual, provide for an annual audit by a certified public accountant, publish audit
140 reports and annual financial reports as provided in chapter 165, provided that the annual
141 financial report may be published on the department of elementary and secondary education's
142 internet website in addition to other publishing requirements, and provide liability insurance
143 to indemnify the school, its board, staff and teachers against tort claims. A charter school that
144 receives local educational agency status under subsection 6 of this section shall meet the
145 requirements imposed by the Elementary and Secondary Education Act for audits of such
146 agencies and comply with all federal audit requirements for charters with local educational
147 agency status. For purposes of an audit by petition under section 29.230, a charter school
148 shall be treated as a political subdivision on the same terms and conditions as the school
149 district in which it is located. For the purposes of securing such insurance, a charter school
150 shall be eligible for the Missouri public entity risk management fund pursuant to section
151 537.700. A charter school that incurs debt shall include a repayment plan in its financial plan;
152 (5) Provide a comprehensive program of instruction for at least one grade or age
153 group from early childhood through grade twelve, as specified in its charter;
154 (6) (a) Design a method to measure pupil progress toward the pupil academic
155 standards adopted by the state board of education pursuant to section 160.514, establish
156 baseline student performance in accordance with the performance contract during the first
157 year of operation, collect student performance data as defined by the annual performance
158 report throughout the duration of the charter to annually monitor student academic
159 performance, and to the extent applicable based upon grade levels offered by the charter
160 school, participate in the statewide system of assessments, comprised of the essential skills
161 tests and the nationally standardized norm-referenced achievement tests, as designated by the
162 state board pursuant to section 160.518, complete and distribute an annual report card as
163 prescribed in section 160.522, which shall also include a statement that background checks
164 have been completed on the charter school's board members, and report to its sponsor, the
165 local school district, and the state board of education as to its teaching methods and any
166 educational innovations and the results thereof. No charter school shall be considered in the
167 Missouri school improvement program review of the district in which it is located for the
168 resource or process standards of the program.
169 (b) For proposed high-risk or alternative charter schools, sponsors shall approve
170 performance measures based on mission, curriculum, teaching methods, and services.
171 Sponsors shall also approve comprehensive academic and behavioral measures to determine
172 whether students are meeting performance standards on a different time frame as specified in
173 that school's charter. Student performance shall be assessed comprehensively to determine
174 whether a high-risk or alternative charter school has documented adequate student progress.

HB 3235 11
175 Student performance shall be based on sponsor-approved comprehensive measures as well as
176 standardized public school measures. Annual presentation of charter school report card data
177 to the department of elementary and secondary education, the state board, and the public shall
178 include comprehensive measures of student progress.
179 (c) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as permitting a charter school to be
180 held to lower performance standards than other public schools within a district; however, the
181 charter of a charter school may permit students to meet performance standards on a different
182 time frame as specified in its charter. The performance standards for alternative and special
183 purpose charter schools that target high-risk students as defined in subdivision (5) of
184 subsection 2 of this section shall be based on measures defined in the school's performance
185 contract with its sponsors;
186 (7) Comply with all applicable federal and state laws and regulations regarding
187 students with disabilities, including sections 162.670 to 162.710, the Individuals with
188 Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1400 et seq.) and Section 504 of the
189 Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Section 794) or successor legislation;
190 (8) Provide along with any request for review by the state board of education the
191 following:
192 (a) Documentation that the applicant has provided a copy of the application to the
193 school board of the district in which the charter school is to be located, except in those
194 circumstances where the school district is the sponsor of the charter school; and
195 (b) A statement outlining the reasons for approval or denial by the sponsor,
196 specifically addressing the requirements of sections 160.400 to 160.425 and 167.349.
197 5. (1) Proposed or existing high-risk or alternative charter schools may include
198 alternative arrangements for students to obtain credit for satisfying graduation requirements in
199 the school's charter application and charter. Alternative arrangements may include, but not be
200 limited to, credit for off-campus instruction, embedded credit, work experience through an
201 internship arranged through the school, and independent studies. When the state board of
202 education approves the charter, any such alternative arrangements shall be approved at such
203 time.
204 (2) The department of elementary and secondary education shall conduct a study of
205 any charter school granted alternative arrangements for students to obtain credit under this
206 subsection after three years of operation to assess student performance, graduation rates,
207 educational outcomes, and entry into the workforce or higher education.
208 6. The charter of a charter school may be amended at the request of the governing
209 body of the charter school and on the approval of the sponsor. The sponsor and the governing
210 board and staff of the charter school shall jointly review the school's performance,
211 management and operations during the first year of operation and then every other year after

HB 3235 12
212 the most recent review or at any point where the operation or management of the charter
213 school is changed or transferred to another entity, either public or private. The governing
214 board of a charter school may amend the charter, if the sponsor approves such amendment, or
215 the sponsor and the governing board may reach an agreement in writing to reflect the charter
216 school's decision to become a local educational agency. In such case the sponsor shall give
217 the department of elementary and secondary education written notice no later than March first
218 of any year, with the agreement to become effective July first. The department may waive the
219 March first notice date in its discretion. The department shall identify and furnish a list of its
220 regulations that pertain to local educational agencies to such schools within thirty days of
221 receiving such notice.
222 7. Sponsors shall annually review the charter school's compliance with statutory
223 standards including:
224 (1) Participation in the statewide system of assessments, as designated by the state
225 board of education under section 160.518;
226 (2) Assurances for the completion and distribution of an annual report card as
227 prescribed in section 160.522;
228 (3) The collection of baseline data during the first three years of operation to
229 determine the longitudinal success of the charter school;
230 (4) A method to measure pupil progress toward the pupil academic standards adopted
231 by the state board of education under section 160.514; and
232 (5) Publication of each charter school's annual performance report.
233 8. (1) (a) A sponsor's policies shall give schools clear, adequate, evidence-based, and
234 timely notice of contract violations or performance deficiencies and mandate intervention
235 based upon findings of the state board of education of the following:
236 a. The charter school provides a high school program which fails to maintain a
237 graduation rate of at least seventy percent in three of the last four school years unless the
238 school has dropout recovery as its mission;
239 b. The charter school's annual performance report results are below the district's
240 annual performance report results based on the performance standards that are applicable to
241 the grade level configuration of both the charter school and the district in which the charter
242 school is located in three of the last four school years; and
243 c. The charter school is identified as a persistently lowest achieving school by the
244 department of elementary and secondary education.
245 (b) A sponsor shall have a policy to revoke a charter during the charter term if there
246 is:
247 a. Clear evidence of underperformance as demonstrated in the charter school's annual
248 performance report in three of the last four school years; or

HB 3235 13
249 b. A violation of the law or the public trust that imperils students or public funds.
250 (c) A sponsor shall revoke a charter or take other appropriate remedial action, which
251 may include placing the charter school on probationary status for no more than twenty-four
252 months, provided that no more than one designation of probationary status shall be allowed
253 for the duration of the charter contract, at any time if the charter school commits a serious
254 breach of one or more provisions of its charter or on any of the following grounds: failure to
255 meet the performance contract as set forth in its charter, failure to meet generally accepted
256 standards of fiscal management, failure to provide information necessary to confirm
257 compliance with all provisions of the charter and sections 160.400 to 160.425 and 167.349
258 within forty-five days following receipt of written notice requesting such information, or
259 violation of law.
260 (2) The sponsor may place the charter school on probationary status to allow the
261 implementation of a remedial plan, which may require a change of methodology, a change in
262 leadership, or both, after which, if such plan is unsuccessful, the charter may be revoked.
263 (3) At least sixty days before acting to revoke a charter, the sponsor shall notify the
264 governing board of the charter school of the proposed action in writing. The notice shall state
265 the grounds for the proposed action. The school's governing board may request in writing a
266 hearing before the sponsor within two weeks of receiving the notice.
267 (4) The sponsor of a charter school shall establish procedures to conduct
268 administrative hearings upon determination by the sponsor that grounds exist to revoke a
269 charter. Final decisions of a sponsor from hearings conducted pursuant to this subsection are
270 subject to an appeal to the state board of education, which shall determine whether the charter
271 shall be revoked.
272 (5) A termination shall be effective only at the conclusion of the school year, unless
273 the sponsor determines that continued operation of the school presents a clear and immediate
274 threat to the health and safety of the children.
275 (6) A charter sponsor shall make available the school accountability report card
276 information as provided under section 160.522 and the results of the academic monitoring
277 required under subsection 3 of this section.
278 9. (1) A sponsor shall take all reasonable steps necessary to confirm that each charter
279 school sponsored by such sponsor is in material compliance and remains in material
280 compliance with all material provisions of the charter and sections 160.400 to 160.425 and
281 167.349. Every charter school shall provide all information necessary to confirm ongoing
282 compliance with all provisions of its charter and sections 160.400 to 160.425 and 167.349 in a
283 timely manner to its sponsor.
284 (2) The sponsor's renewal process of the charter school shall be based on the thorough
285 analysis of a comprehensive body of objective evidence and consider if:

HB 3235 14
286 (a) The charter school has maintained results on its annual performance report that
287 meet or exceed the district in which the charter school is located based on the performance
288 standards that are applicable to the grade-level configuration of both the charter school and
289 the district in which the charter school is located in three of the last four school years;
290 (b) The charter school is organizationally and fiscally viable determining at a
291 minimum that the school does not have:
292 a. A negative balance in its operating funds;
293 b. A combined balance of less than three percent of the amount expended for such
294 funds during the previous fiscal year; or
295 c. Expenditures that exceed receipts for the most recently completed fiscal year;
296 (c) The charter is in compliance with its legally binding performance contract and
297 sections 160.400 to 160.425 and section 167.349; and
298 (d) The charter school has an annual performance report consistent with a
299 classification of accredited for three of the last four years and is fiscally viable as described in
300 paragraph (b) of this subdivision. If such is the case, the charter school may have an
301 expedited renewal process as defined by rule of the department of elementary and secondary
302 education.
303 (3) (a) Beginning August first during the year in which a charter is considered for
304 renewal, a charter school sponsor shall demonstrate to the state board of education that the
305 charter school is in compliance with federal and state law as provided in sections 160.400 to
306 160.425 and section 167.349 and the school's performance contract including but not limited
307 to those requirements specific to academic performance.
308 (b) Along with data reflecting the academic performance standards indicated in
309 paragraph (a) of this subdivision, the sponsor shall submit a revised charter application to the
310 state board of education for review.
311 (c) Using the data requested and the revised charter application under paragraphs (a)
312 and (b) of this subdivision, the state board of education shall determine if compliance with all
313 standards enumerated in this subdivision has been achieved. The state board of education at
314 its next regularly scheduled meeting shall vote on the revised charter application.
315 (d) If a charter school sponsor demonstrates the objectives identified in this
316 subdivision, the state board of education shall renew the school's charter.
317 10. A school district may enter into a lease with a charter school for physical
318 facilities.
319 11. A governing board or a school district employee who has control over personnel
320 actions shall not take unlawful reprisal against another employee at the school district because
321 the employee is directly or indirectly involved in an application to establish a charter school.
322 A governing board or a school district employee shall not take unlawful reprisal against an

HB 3235 15
323 educational program of the school or the school district because an application to establish a
324 charter school proposes the conversion of all or a portion of the educational program to a
325 charter school. As used in this subsection, "unlawful reprisal" means an action that is taken
326 by a governing board or a school district employee as a direct result of a lawful application to
327 establish a charter school and that is adverse to another employee or an educational program.
328 12. Charter school board members shall be subject to the same liability for acts while
329 in office as if they were regularly and duly elected members of school boards in any other
330 public school district in this state. The governing board of a charter school may participate, to
331 the same extent as a school board, in the Missouri public entity risk management fund in the
332 manner provided under sections 537.700 to 537.756.
333 13. Any entity, either public or private, operating, administering, or otherwise
334 managing a charter school shall be considered a quasi-public governmental body and subject
335 to the provisions of sections 610.010 to 610.035.
336 14. The chief financial officer of a charter school shall maintain:
337 (1) A surety bond in an amount determined by the sponsor to be adequate based on
338 the cash flow of the school; or
339 (2) An insurance policy issued by an insurance company licensed to do business in
340 Missouri on all employees in the amount of five hundred thousand dollars or more that
341 provides coverage in the event of employee theft.
342 15. The department of elementary and secondary education shall calculate an annual
343 performance report for each charter school and shall publish it in the same manner as annual
344 performance reports are calculated and published for districts and attendance centers.
345 [16. The joint committee on education shall create a committee to investigate facility
346 access and affordability for charter schools. The committee shall be comprised of equal
347 numbers of the charter school sector and the public school sector and shall report its findings
348 to the general assembly by December 31, 2016.]
167.950. 1. (1) By December 31, 2017, the department of elementary and secondary
education shall develop guidelines for the appropriate screening of students for dyslexia and
related disorders and the necessary classroom support for students with dyslexia and related
disorders. [Such guidelines shall be consistent with the findings and recommendations of the
task force created under section 633.420.]
(2) In the 2018-19 school year and subsequent years, each public school, including
each charter school, shall conduct dyslexia screenings for students in the appropriate year
consistent with the guidelines developed by the department of elementary and secondary
education.
(3) In the 2018-19 school year and subsequent years, the school board of each district
and the governing board of each charter school shall provide reasonable classroom support

HB 3235 16
consistent with the guidelines developed by the department of elementary and secondary
education.
2. In the 2018-19 school year and subsequent years, the practicing teacher assistance
programs established under section 168.400 shall offer and include two hours of in-service
training provided by each local school district for all practicing teachers in such district
regarding dyslexia and related disorders. Each charter school shall also offer all of its
teachers two hours of training on dyslexia and related disorders. Districts and charter schools
may seek assistance from the department of elementary and secondary education in
developing and providing such training. Completion of such training shall count as two
contact hours of professional development under section 168.021.
3. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Dyslexia", a disorder that is neurological in origin, characterized by difficulties
with accurate and fluent word recognition and poor spelling and decoding abilities that
typically result from a deficit in the phonological component of language, often unexpected in
relation to other cognitive abilities and the provision of effective classroom instruction, and of
which secondary consequences may include problems in reading comprehension and reduced
reading experience that can impede growth of vocabulary and background knowledge.
Nothing in this definition shall require a student with dyslexia to obtain an individualized
education program (IEP) unless the student has otherwise met the federal conditions
necessary;
(2) "Dyslexia screening", a short test conducted by a teacher or school counselor to
determine whether a student likely has dyslexia or a related disorder in which a positive result
does not represent a medical diagnosis but indicates that the student could benefit from
approved support;
(3) "Related disorders", disorders similar to or related to dyslexia, such as
developmental auditory imperception, dysphasia, specific developmental dyslexia,
developmental dysgraphia, and developmental spelling disability;
(4) "Support", low-cost and effective best practices, such as oral examinations and
extended test-taking periods, used to support students who have dyslexia or any related
disorder.
4. The state board of education shall promulgate rules and regulations for each public
school to screen students for dyslexia and related disorders and to provide the necessary
classroom support for students with dyslexia and related disorders. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to

HB 3235 17
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after August 28, 2016, shall be invalid and void.
5. Nothing in this section shall require the MO HealthNet program to expand the
services that it provides.
173.750. 1. By July 1, 1995, the coordinating board for higher education, within
existing resources provided to the department of higher education and workforce
development and by rule and regulation, shall have established and implemented a
procedure for annually reporting the performance of graduates of public high schools in the
state during the student's initial year in the public colleges and universities of the state. The
purpose of such reports shall be to assist in determining how high schools are preparing
students for successful college and university performance. The report produced pursuant to
this subsection shall annually be furnished to the state board of education for reporting
pursuant to subsection 4 of section 161.610 and shall not be used for any other purpose until
such time that a standard process and consistent, specific criteria for determining a student's
need for remedial coursework is agreed upon by the coordinating board for higher education,
higher education institutions, and the state board of education.
2. The procedures shall be designed so that the reporting is made by the name of each
high school in the state, with individual student data to be grouped according to the high
school from which the students graduated. The data in the reports shall be disaggregated by
race and sex. The procedures shall not be designed so that the reporting contains the name of
any student. No grade point average shall be disclosed under subsection 3 of this section in
any case where three or fewer students from a particular high school attend a particular
college or university.
3. The data reported shall include grade point averages after the initial college year,
calculated on, or adjusted to, a four point grade scale; the percentage of students returning to
college after the first and second half of the initial college year, or after each trimester of the
initial college year; the percentage of students taking noncollege level classes in basic
academic courses during the first college year, or remedial courses in basic academic subjects
of English, mathematics, or reading; and other such data as determined by rule and regulation
of the coordinating board for higher education.
[4. The department of elementary and secondary education shall conduct a review of
its policies and procedures relating to remedial education in light of the best practices in
remediation identified as required by subdivision (7) of subsection 2 of section 173.005 to
ensure that school districts are informed about best practices to reduce the need for
remediation. The department shall present its results to the joint committee on education by
October 31, 2017.]

HB 3235 18
[167.910. 1. There is hereby established the "Career Readiness Course
Task Force" to explore the possibility of a course covering the topics described
in this section being offered in the public schools to students in eighth grade or
ninth grade. Task force members shall be chosen to represent the geographic
diversity of the state. All task force members shall be appointed before
October 31, 2018. The task force members shall be appointed as follows:
(1) A parent of a student attending elementary school, appointed by
the joint committee on education;
(2) A parent of a student attending a grade not lower than the sixth nor
higher than the eighth grade, appointed by the joint committee on education;
(3) A parent of a student attending high school, appointed by the joint
committee on education;
(4) An elementary education professional from an accredited school
district, appointed by the joint committee on education from names submitted
by statewide education employee organizations;
(5) Two education professionals giving instruction in a grade or grades
not lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade in accredited school
districts, appointed by the joint committee on education from names submitted
by statewide education employee organizations;
(6) Two secondary education professionals from accredited school
districts, appointed by the joint committee on education from names submitted
by statewide education employee organizations;
(7) A career and technical education professional who has experience
serving as an advisor to a statewide career and technical education
organization, appointed by a statewide career and technical education
organization;
(8) An education professional from an accredited technical high
school, appointed by a statewide career and technical education organization;
(9) A public school board member, appointed by a statewide
association of school boards;
(10) A secondary school principal, appointed by a statewide
association of secondary school principals;
(11) A principal of a school giving instruction in a grade or grades not
lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade, appointed by a statewide
association of secondary school principals;
(12) An elementary school counselor, appointed by a statewide
association of school counselors;
(13) Two school counselors from a school giving instruction in a grade
or grades not lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade, appointed
by a statewide association of school counselors;
(14) A secondary school counselor, appointed by a statewide
association of school counselors;
(15) A secondary school career and college counselor, appointed by a
statewide association of school counselors;
(16) An apprenticeship professional, appointed by the division of
workforce development of economic development;
(17) A representative of Missouri Project Lead the Way, appointed by
the statewide Project Lead the Way organization;

HB 3235 19
(18) A representative of the state technical college, appointed by the
state technical college;
(19) A representative of a public community college, appointed by a
statewide organization of community colleges; and
(20) A representative of a public four-year institution of higher
education, appointed by the commissioner of higher education.
2. The members of the task force established under subsection 1 of this
section shall elect a chair from among the membership of the task force. The
task force shall meet as needed to complete its consideration of the course
described in subsection 5 of this section and provide its findings and
recommendations as described in subsection 6 of this section. Members of the
task force shall serve without compensation. No school district policy or
administrative action shall require any education employee member to use
personal leave or incur a reduction in pay for participating on the task force.
3. The task force shall hold at least three public hearings to provide an
opportunity to receive public testimony including, but not limited to, testimony
from educators, local school boards, parents, representatives from business
and industry, labor and community leaders, members of the general assembly,
and the general public.
4. The department of elementary and secondary education shall
provide such legal, research, clerical, and technical services as the task force
may require in the performance of its duties.
5. The task force established under subsection 1 of this section shall
consider a course that:
(1) Gives students an opportunity to explore various career and
educational opportunities by:
(a) Administering career surveys to students and helping students use
Missouri Connections to determine their career interests and develop plans to
meet their career goals;
(b) Explaining the differences between types of colleges, including
two-year and four-year colleges and noting the availability of registered
apprenticeship programs as alternatives to college for students;
(c) Describing technical degrees offered by colleges;
(d) Explaining the courses and educational experiences offered at
community colleges;
(e) Describing the various certificates and credentials available to earn
at the school or other schools including, but not limited to, career and technical
education certificates described under section 170.029 and industry-
recognized certificates and credentials;
(f) Advising students of any advanced placement courses that they
may take at the school;
(g) Describing any opportunities at the school for dual enrollment;
(h) Advising students of any Project Lead the Way courses offered at
the school and explaining how Project Lead the Way courses help students
learn valuable skills;
(i) Informing students of the availability of funding for postsecondary
education through the A+ schools program described under section 160.545;
(j) Describing the availability of virtual courses;

HB 3235 20
(k) Describing the types of skills and occupations most in demand in
the current job market and those skills and occupations likely to be in high
demand in future years;
100 (l) Describing the typical salaries for occupations, salary trends, and
101 opportunities for advancement in various occupations;
102 (m) Emphasizing the opportunities available in careers involving
103 science, technology, engineering, and math;
104 (n) Advising students of the resources offered by workforce or job
105 centers;
106 (o) Preparing students for the ACT assessment or the ACT WorkKeys
107 assessments required for the National Career Readiness Certificate;
108 (p) Administering a practice ACT assessment or practice ACT
109 WorkKeys assessments required for the National Career Readiness Certificate
110 to students;
111 (q) Advising students of opportunities to take the SAT and the Armed
112 Services Vocational Aptitude Battery;
113 (r) Administering a basic math test to students so that they can assess
114 their math skills;
115 (s) Administering a basic writing test to students so that they can
116 assess their writing skills;
117 (t) Helping each student prepare a personal plan of study that outlines
118 a sequence of courses and experiences that concludes with the student reaching
119 his or her postsecondary goals; and
120 (u) Explaining how to complete college applications and the Free
121 Application for Federal Student Aid;
122 (2) Focuses on career readiness and emphasizes the importance of
123 work ethic, communication, collaboration, critical thinking, and creativity;
124 (3) Demonstrates that graduation from a four-year college is not the
125 only pathway to success by describing to students at least sixteen pathways to
126 success in detail and including guest visitors who represent each pathway
127 described. In exploring how these pathways could be covered in the course,
128 the task force shall consider how instructors for the course may be able to rely
129 on assistance from Missouri's career pathways within the department of
130 elementary and secondary education;
131 (4) Provides student loan counseling; and
132 (5) May include parent-student meetings.
133 6. Before December 1, 2019, the task force established under
134 subsection 1 of this section shall present its findings and recommendations to
135 the speaker of the house of representatives, the president pro tempore of the
136 senate, the joint committee on education, and the state board of education.
137 Upon presenting the findings and recommendations as described in this
138 subsection, the task force shall dissolve.]
[167.910. 1. There is hereby established the "Career Readiness Course
Task Force" to explore the possibility of a course covering the topics described
in this section being offered in the public schools to students in eighth grade or
ninth grade. Task force members shall be chosen to represent the geographic

HB 3235 21
diversity of the state. All task force members shall be appointed before
October 31, 2018. The task force members shall be appointed as follows:
(1) A parent of a student attending elementary school, appointed by a
statewide association of parents and teachers;
(2) A parent of a student attending a grade not lower than the sixth nor
higher than the eighth grade, appointed by a statewide association of parents
and teachers;
(3) A parent of a student attending high school, appointed by a
statewide association of parents and teachers;
(4) An elementary education professional from an accredited school
district, appointed by agreement among the Missouri State Teachers
Association, the Missouri National Education Association, and the American
Federation of Teachers of Missouri;
(5) An education professional giving instruction in a grade or grades
not lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade in an accredited
school district, appointed by agreement among the Missouri State Teachers
Association, the Missouri National Education Association, and the American
Federation of Teachers of Missouri;
(6) A secondary education professional from an accredited school
district, appointed by agreement among the Missouri State Teachers
Association, the Missouri National Education Association, and the American
Federation of Teachers of Missouri;
(7) A career and technical education professional who has experience
serving as an advisor to a statewide career and technical education
organization, appointed by a statewide career and technical education
organization;
(8) An education professional from an accredited technical high
school, appointed by a statewide career and technical education organization;
(9) A public school board member, appointed by a statewide
association of school boards;
(10) A secondary school principal, appointed by a statewide
association of secondary school principals;
(11) A principal of a school giving instruction in a grade or grades not
lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade, appointed by a statewide
association of secondary school principals;
(12) An elementary school counselor, appointed by a statewide
association of school counselors;
(13) A school counselor from a school giving instruction in a grade or
grades not lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade, appointed by
a statewide association of school counselors;
(14) A secondary school counselor, appointed by a statewide
association of school counselors;
(15) A secondary school career and college counselor, appointed by a
statewide association of school counselors;
(16) An apprenticeship professional, appointed by the division of
workforce development of the department of economic development;
(17) A representative of Missouri Project Lead the Way, appointed by
the statewide Project Lead the Way organization;

HB 3235 22
(18) A representative of the State Technical College of Missouri,
appointed by the State Technical College of Missouri;
(19) A representative of a public community college, appointed by a
statewide organization of community colleges; and
(20) A representative of a public four-year institution of higher
education, appointed by the commissioner of higher education.
2. The members of the task force established under subsection 1 of this
section shall elect a chair from among the membership of the task force. The
task force shall meet as needed to complete its consideration of the course
described in subsection 5 of this section and provide its findings and
recommendations as described in subsection 6 of this section. Members of the
task force shall serve without compensation. No school district policy or
administrative action shall require any education employee member to use
personal leave or incur a reduction in pay for participating on the task force.
3. The task force shall hold at least three public hearings to provide an
opportunity to receive public testimony including, but not limited to, testimony
from educators, local school boards, parents, representatives from business
and industry, labor and community leaders, members of the general assembly,
and the general public.
4. The department of elementary and secondary education shall
provide such legal, research, clerical, and technical services as the task force
may require in the performance of its duties.
5. The task force established under subsection 1 of this section shall
consider a course that:
(1) Gives students an opportunity to explore various career and
educational opportunities by:
(a) Administering career surveys to students and helping students use
Missouri Connections to determine their career interests and develop plans to
meet their career goals;
(b) Explaining the differences between types of colleges, including
two-year and four-year colleges, and noting the availability of registered
apprenticeship programs as alternatives to college for students;
(c) Describing technical degrees offered by colleges;
(d) Explaining the courses and educational experiences offered at
community colleges;
(e) Describing the various certificates and credentials available to earn
at the school or other schools including, but not limited to, career and technical
education certificates described under section 170.029 and industry-
recognized certificates and credentials;
(f) Advising students of any advanced placement courses that they
may take at the school;
(g) Describing any opportunities at the school for dual enrollment;
(h) Advising students of any Project Lead the Way courses offered at
the school and explaining how Project Lead the Way courses help students
learn valuable skills;
(i) Informing students of the availability of funding for postsecondary
education through the A+ schools program described under section 160.545;
100 (j) Describing the availability of virtual courses;

HB 3235 23
101 (k) Describing the types of skills and occupations most in demand in
102 the current job market and those skills and occupations likely to be in high
103 demand in future years;
104 (l) Describing the typical salaries for occupations, salary trends, and
105 opportunities for advancement in various occupations;
106 (m) Emphasizing the opportunities available in careers involving
107 science, technology, engineering, and math;
108 (n) Advising students of the resources offered by workforce or job
109 centers;
110 (o) Preparing students for the ACT assessment or the ACT WorkKeys
111 assessments required for the National Career Readiness Certificate;
112 (p) Administering a practice ACT assessment or practice ACT
113 WorkKeys assessments required for the National Career Readiness Certificate
114 to students;
115 (q) Advising students of opportunities to take the SAT and the Armed
116 Services Vocational Aptitude Battery;
117 (r) Administering a basic math test to students so that they can assess
118 their math skills;
119 (s) Administering a basic writing test to students so that they can
120 assess their writing skills;
121 (t) Helping each student prepare a personal plan of study that outlines
122 a sequence of courses and experiences that concludes with the student reaching
123 his or her postsecondary goals; and
124 (u) Explaining how to complete college applications and the Free
125 Application for Federal Student Aid;
126 (2) Focuses on career readiness and emphasizes the importance of
127 work ethic, communication, collaboration, critical thinking, and creativity;
128 (3) Demonstrates that graduation from a four-year college is not the
129 only pathway to success by describing to students at least sixteen pathways to
130 success in detail and including guest visitors who represent each pathway
131 described. In exploring how these pathways could be covered in the course,
132 the task force shall consider how instructors for the course may be able to rely
133 on assistance from Missouri Career Pathways within the department of
134 elementary and secondary education;
135 (4) Provides student loan counseling; and
136 (5) May include parent-student meetings.
137 6. Before December 1, 2019, the task force established under
138 subsection 1 of this section shall present its findings and recommendations to
139 the speaker of the house of representatives, the president pro tempore of the
140 senate, the joint committee on education, and the state board of education.
141 Upon presenting the findings and recommendations as described in this
142 subsection, the task force shall dissolve.]
[173.680. 1. The department of higher education and workforce
development shall conduct a study to identify the information technology
industry certifications most frequently requested by employers in Missouri.
The department of higher education and workforce development may conduct
the study with the assistance of other state departments and agencies, the

HB 3235 24
Missouri mathematics and science coalition, and the governor's advisory
council on science, technology, engineering, and mathematical issues.
2. The department of higher education and workforce development
shall complete the study no later than January 31, 2015. The department shall
prepare the findings in a report and provide it to:
(1) The president pro tempore of the senate;
(2) The speaker of the house of representatives;
(3) The joint committee on education;
(4) The governor;
(5) The coordinating board for higher education; and
(6) The state board of education.]
[633.420. 1. For the purposes of this section, the term "dyslexia"
means a disorder that is neurological in origin, characterized by difficulties
with accurate and fluent word recognition, and poor spelling and decoding
abilities that typically result from a deficit in the phonological component of
language, often unexpected in relation to other cognitive abilities and the
provision of effective classroom instruction, and of which secondary
consequences may include problems in reading comprehension and reduced
reading experience that can impede growth of vocabulary and background
knowledge. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a district from assessing
students for dyslexia and offering students specialized reading instruction if a
determination is made that a student suffers from dyslexia. Unless required by
federal law, nothing in this definition shall require a student with dyslexia to be
automatically determined eligible as a student with a disability. Nothing in
this definition shall require a student with dyslexia to obtain an individualized
education program (IEP) unless the student has otherwise met the federal
conditions necessary.
2. There is hereby created the "Legislative Task Force on Dyslexia".
The joint committee on education shall provide technical and administrative
support as required by the task force to fulfill its duties; any such support
involving monetary expenses shall first be approved by the chairman of the
joint committee on education. The task force shall meet at least quarterly and
may hold meetings by telephone or video conference. The task force shall
advise and make recommendations to the governor, joint committee on
education, and relevant state agencies regarding matters concerning
individuals with dyslexia, including education and other adult and
adolescent services.
3. The task force shall be comprised of twenty-one members
consisting of the following:
(1) Two members of the senate appointed by the president pro tempore
of the senate, with one member appointed from the minority party and one
member appointed from the majority party;
(2) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives, with one member appointed from the
minority party and one member appointed from the majority party;
(3) The commissioner of education, or his or her designee;

HB 3235 25
(4) One representative from an institution of higher education located
in this state with specialized expertise in dyslexia and reading instruction;
(5) A representative from a state teachers association or the Missouri
National Education Association;
(6) A representative from the International Dyslexia Association of
Missouri;
(7) A representative from Decoding Dyslexia of Missouri;
(8) A representative from the Missouri Association of Elementary
School Principals;
(9) A representative from the Missouri Council of Administrators of
Special Education;
(10) A professional licensed in the state of Missouri with experience
diagnosing dyslexia including, but not limited to, a licensed psychologist,
school psychologist, or neuropsychologist;
(11) A speech-language pathologist with training and experience in
early literacy development and effective research-based intervention
techniques for dyslexia, including an Orton-Gillingham remediation program
recommended by the Missouri Speech-Language Hearing Association;
(12) A certified academic language therapist recommended by the
Academic Language Therapy Association who is a resident of this state;
(13) A representative from an independent private provider or
nonprofit organization serving individuals with dyslexia;
(14) An assistive technology specialist with expertise in accessible
print materials and assistive technology used by individuals with dyslexia
recommended by the Missouri assistive technology council;
(15) One private citizen who has a child who has been diagnosed with
dyslexia;
(16) One private citizen who has been diagnosed with dyslexia;
(17) A representative of the Missouri State Council of the
International Reading Association;
(18) A pediatrician with knowledge of dyslexia; and
(19) A member of the Missouri School Boards' Association.
4. The members of the task force, other than the members from the
general assembly and ex officio members, shall be appointed by the president
pro tempore of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives by
September 1, 2016, by alternating appointments beginning with the president
pro tempore of the senate. A chairperson shall be selected by the members of
the task force. Any vacancy on the task force shall be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment. Members shall serve on the task force
without compensation.
5. The task force shall make recommendations for a statewide system
for identification, intervention, and delivery of supports for students with
dyslexia, including the development of resource materials and professional
development activities. These recommendations shall be included in a report
to the governor and joint committee on education and shall include findings
and proposed legislation and shall be made available no longer than twelve
months from the task force's first meeting.

HB 3235 26
6. The recommendations and resource materials developed by the task
force shall:
(1) Identify valid and reliable screening and evaluation assessments
and protocols that can be used and the appropriate personnel to administer
such assessments in order to identify children with dyslexia or the
characteristics of dyslexia as part of an ongoing reading progress monitoring
system, multitiered system of supports, and special education eligibility
determinations in schools;
(2) Recommend an evidence-based reading instruction, with
consideration of the National Reading Panel Report and Orton-Gillingham
methodology principles for use in all Missouri schools, and intervention
system, including a list of effective dyslexia intervention programs, to address
dyslexia or characteristics of dyslexia for use by schools in multitiered systems
of support and for services as appropriate for special education eligible
students;
(3) Develop and implement preservice and in-service professional
development activities to address dyslexia identification and intervention,
100 including utilization of accessible print materials and assistive technology,
101 within degree programs such as education, reading, special education, speech-
102 language pathology, and psychology;
103 (4) Review teacher certification and professional development
104 requirements as they relate to the needs of students with dyslexia;
105 (5) Examine the barriers to accurate information on the prevalence of
106 students with dyslexia across the state and recommend a process for accurate
107 reporting of demographic data; and
108 (6) Study and evaluate current practices for diagnosing, treating, and
109 educating children in this state and examine how current laws and regulations
110 affect students with dyslexia in order to present recommendations to the
111 governor and the joint committee on education.
112 7. The task force shall hire or contract for hire specialist services to
113 support the work of the task force as necessary with appropriations made by
114 the general assembly to the joint committee on education for that purpose or
115 from other available funding.
116 8. The task force authorized under this section shall expire on August
117 31, 2018, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly.]
✔